Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-420, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-420. A. Any Except as provided for in subsection C
of this section, any person charged with aggravated trafficking
pursuant to Section 2-415 of this title shall not be subject to
pretrial release as specified in Section 1105.3 of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes and shall not be released on bail without a Global
Positioning System (GPS) monitoring device attached to the person
and cost thereof paid by such person at his or her own expense until
after the conclusion of the criminal case. The Department of
Corrections shall monitor such GPS monitoring device and the person
Req. No. 10922 Page 1

unti l the conclusion of the case, and the person shall pay a
supervision fee as provided for other persons subject to supervision
by the Department. At the conclusion of the case, the court shall
order the removal of the GPS monitoring device if the person is
acquitted or is to be incarcerated or the case is dismissed.
B. The Department of Corrections shall maintain statistical
records on any aggravated trafficking offense, including a
calculation of the time period from arrest to disposition, and if
the person is convicted, the term of sentence, length of sentence
actually served in incarceration, amount of the fine imposed,
whether any enhancements or co-occurring offenses were involved,
whether the person is determined upon reception into the custody of
the Department to be an addicted person, and whether the person has
prior convictions by stating the prior offenses.
C. Any person charged and confined in a county jail for
aggravated trafficking who requires medical care and treatment in a
hospital facility and is released from jail on his or her own
recognizance shall not be subject to GPS monitoring, as required in
subsection A of this section, while receiving medical care and
treatment in the hospital. Upon discharge from the hospital, the
person shall be required to have a GPS monitoring device attached
within forty-eight (48) hours with the cost thereof paid by the
person at his or her own expense. The Department shall monitor the
GPS monitoring device as specified in subsection A of this section.
Req. No. 10922 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10922 GRS 12/20/24





















Req. No. 10922 Page 3